District of Columbia statutes.
16-2352

Definitions.

(a)

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1)

“Parent and child relationship” includes all rights, powers, privileges, immunities, duties and obligations existing under law between a parent and child, including rights of inheritance. The words apply equally to every child and every parent regardless of the marital status of the parents of the child.

(2)

“termination of the parent and child relationship” means the adjudication that a child is free from the custody and control of either or both of his or her living parents by means of a court order that completely severs and extinguishes the parent and child relationship.

(b)

The terms found in this subchapter which are defined in section 16-2301 of this chapter shall be given the same definition herein.

History

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title IV, § 410, 24 DCR 3341

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-2352.
1973 Ed., § 16-2352.